Montana, session 2025, SB405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Transfer of funds. Within 15 days of [the effective date of this act], the
state treasurer shall transfer $50 million from the general fund to the housing Montana fund provided for in 90-
6-133.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Department to update rules. (1) Beginning on [the effective date of this
act], the department of commerce shall review and update rules under the authority provided in 90-6-136.
(2) Amendments to rules required in this section must be adopted before the 70th legislative
session.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 405